Massachusetts, session 194th, H5297.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Suzanne Garcia, a member of 
the state employees’ retirement system for service rendered prior to April 2, 2012 and a member 
of the Framingham retirement system for service beginning after April 2, 2012, may, for 
purposes of paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, elect 
to receive a retirement allowance consisting of pro-rated benefits based upon the percentage of 
total years of service that Suzanne Garcia rendered in each group to which Suzanne Garcia was 
classified, despite not being an active member of either retirement system as of April 2, 2012. 
The pro-rated benefits shall be calculated in a manner prescribed by the public employee 
retirement administration commission as required under said paragraph (a) of said subdivision 
(2) of said section 5 of said chapter 32.